Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 2. Preference for State Laborers

Cross references. —

As to preference for resident contractors, see §

16-6-102

.

As to preference for state labor and materials, see §§

16-6-104

through

16-6-107

.

As to preference for resident bidders in letting of public printing contracts, see §

16-6-301

.

As to preference for residents in leasing state lands, see §

36-5-105

.

Wyoming Preference Act does not violate privileges-and-immunities clause of federal constitution,

notwithstanding its infringement upon the fundamental right to travel to another state for purposes of employment, because it narrowly addresses the goal of reduced unemployment among the state's taxpayers by preferring available, qualified residents for government-funded positions, and thus the degree of discrimination bears a close relation to the state's valid reasons for discriminatory treatment. State v. Antonich, 694 P.2d 60,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 535

(Wyo. 1985).

Stated

in

Powell v. Daily, 712 P.2d 356,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 448

(Wyo. 1986).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Limits of State Activity in the Interstate Water Market,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 357 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and effect of requirement under state statute or local ordinance giving local or locally qualified contractors a percentage preference in determining lowest bid, 89 ALR4th 587.

§ 16-6-201.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Wyoming Preference Act of 1971”.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 207, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-680.1; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-401; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-6-202(a)(iv).

§ 16-6-202.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Laborer” means a person employed to perform unskilled or skilled manual labor for wages in any capacity and does not include independent contractors;

“Resident” or “Wyoming laborer” includes any person who is a citizen of the United States, or a person who is authorized to work in the United States by an agency of the federal government, and has resided in the state of Wyoming for at least ninety (90) days, or as otherwise authorized by department of workforce services rules, preceding the application for employment;

“Wages” means a payment of money for labor or services according to a contract or any hourly, daily or piece-work basis;

“Public work” means as described in W.S. 16-6-101(a)(ix);

“Public entity” means as defined in W.S. 16-6-101(a)(viii);

“This act” means W.S.

16-6-201

through

16-6-206

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 207, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-680.2; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-402; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 125, § 1; 2013 ch. 134, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 90, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, inserted “or a person who is authorized to working the United States by an agency of the federal government” and made stylistic changes in (a)(ii).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(iv) and redesignated former (a)(iv) as present (a)(v).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (a)(ii), added "or 'Wyoming laborer,'" substituted "for at least ninety (90) days, or as otherwise authorized by department of workforce services rules, preceding the" for "for at least one (1) year immediately preceding his"; added (a)(v); and redesignated former (a)(v) as (a)(vi).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law — Wyoming Upholds a Resident Laborer Preference Statute. State v. Antonich, 694 P.2d 60,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 535

(Wyo. 1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 219 (1986).

§ 16-6-203.
Required resident labor on public works; exception.

Except as otherwise provided in this act, every person who is responsible for a public work shall employ only Wyoming laborers on the public work. Every contract for a public work let by any person shall contain a provision requiring that Wyoming laborers be used except nonresident laborers may be used when Wyoming laborers are not available for the employment from within the state or are not qualified to perform the work involved. The contract shall contain a provision requiring specific acknowledgement of the requirements of this section. A person required to employ Wyoming laborers may employ nonresident laborers if:

That person submits written notice to the nearest state workforce center of his need for laborers. The notice may include the person’s need for laborers on multiple public works that the person is responsible for during a nine (9) month period. The notice shall specify if the need for laborers constitutes an emergency that endangers the health, welfare or safety of the public as determined by the public entity associated with the public work. If the person’s need for laborers substantially changes during the period, the person may amend the written notice submitted under this paragraph;

The state workforce center certifies that the person’s need for laborers cannot be filled from those Wyoming laborers listed with the Wyoming department of workforce services or that an emergency exists that endangers the health, welfare or safety of the public as determined by the public entity associated with the public work for which Wyoming laborers are not readily available. The certification shall specify the number of nonresident laborers the person may employ on the public works the person is responsible for during the nine (9) month period following certification. Except as provided in this paragraph, the state workforce center shall respond to a person’s request for certification or certification amendment within ten (10) days of the date the written notice is received. The state workforce center shall respond to a person’s emergency request for certification as soon as practicable but not to exceed three (3) days after the date the emergency request is received; and

Upon hiring, the person shall submit to the state workforce center the number of nonresident laborers employed by the person pursuant to the certification issued under paragraph (ii) of this subsection and the public work or works for which each nonresident laborer is employed during the period of certification. The number of nonresident laborers employed during the period of certification shall not exceed the number specified by the certification or certification amendment.

Upon request by a state workforce center, the general contractor shall provide the most recent construction schedule for a public work.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 207, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-680.3; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-403; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1988, ch. 14, § 1; 2012, ch. 106, § 1; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 90, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to establishment of state employment offices, see §

27-3-601

et seq.

The 2012 amendment,

redesignated the existing provisions as the introductory language of (a), (a)(i) and (a)(ii), added the present third sentence in the introductory language of (a), substituted “workforce center” for “employment office” in (a)(i) and (a)(ii); added “at least eleven (11) days before work is commenced” in (a)(i); substituted “Wyoming laborers listed with the Wyoming department of workforce services. The department shall respond to a person's request for certification within ten (10) days” for “listed as” in (a)(i), and made stylistic changes; and added (b).

Laws 2012, ch. 106, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 21, 2012.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a) substituted “who is responsible for a public work shall employ” for “who is charged with the duty of construction, reconstructing, improving, enlarging, altering or repairing any public works project or improvement for the state or any political subdivision, municipal corporation, or other governmental unit, shall employ,” “public work” for “project or improvement,” and added “for a public work” after “Every contract.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted "projects" following "public works" in the section heading; in the first sentence of (a), added "Except as otherwise provided in this act," at the beginning, substituted "laborers" for "labor" following "requiring that Wyoming," "nonresident" for "other" following "be used except," "nonresident" for "other than Wyoming" in the second sentence and made a related change; rewrote (a)(i), which read, "That person informs the nearest state workforce center of his employment needs at least eleven (11) days before work is commenced; and"; rewrote (a)(ii), which read, "The state workforce center certifies that the person’s need for laborers cannot be filled from those Wyoming laborers listed with the Wyoming department of workforce services. The department shall respond to a person’s request for certification within ten (10) days of the date the information is filed"; added (a)(iii); in (b), substituted "a state" for "the" preceding "workforce" and "a public work" for "the project."

Quoted

in

State v. Antonich, 694 P.2d 60,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 535

(Wyo. 1985).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law — Wyoming Upholds a Resident Laborer Preference Statute. State v. Antonich, 694 P.2d 60,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 535

(Wyo. 1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 219 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Aliens: constitutionality of enactment or regulation forbidding or restricting employment of aliens in public employment or on public works, 38 ALR3d 1213.

Validity of state statute or local ordinance requiring, or giving preference to, the employment of residents by contractors or subcontractors engaged in, or awarded contracts for, the construction of public works or improvements, 36 ALR4th 941.

§ 16-6-204.
Employees not covered by provisions.

All other employees of the contractor or subcontractor, other than laborers as defined by this act, are not covered by this act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 207, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 9-680.4; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-404; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in this section, see § 16-6-202(a)(iv).

§ 16-6-205.
Enforcement.

The department of workforce services shall promulgate rules and regulations required to enforce this act and is authorized and directed to enforce this act. For purposes of all investigations, the department shall have the power to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of any books, papers, documents or records which the department deems relevant or material to the inquiry.

If requested in writing by the department of workforce services or contracting entity, the general contractor shall provide to the department or contracting entity a payroll report for the period requested for all contractors and subcontractors involved in the project in a form that is consistent with federally certified reporting requirements and includes residency status for each laborer.

This act shall not be enforced in a manner which conflicts with any federal statutes or rules and regulations.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 207, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 9-680.5; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-405; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2012, ch. 106, § 1; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to governing of federal funds by federal law, see §

16-6-108

.

The 2012 amendment,

added (a) and (b); and redesignated existing provisions as (c).

Laws 2012, ch. 106, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 21, 2012.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b) substituted “If requested in writing by the department of workforce services or contracting entity” for “Along with each application for payment for a contract subject to this act,” added “department or” preceding “contracting entity” and “for the period requested” after “payroll report.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-6-202(a)(iv).

§ 16-6-206.
Failure to employ state laborers; penalty.

A person who willfully or intentionally fails to use Wyoming laborers as required in this act shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) per nonresident laborer employed per day, not to exceed a total penalty of ten percent (10%) of the amount of the person’s contract. Each separate case of failure to employ Wyoming laborers on a public work constitutes a separate offense.

In the event a second offense occurs within a twelve (12) month period from the date of the first offense, the person shall be barred from bidding on any contract subject to the provisions of this act or submitting any request for proposal on any public work subject to the provisions of this act for one (1) year from the date the second violation is corrected.

Before a civil penalty is imposed under this section, the department of workforce services shall notify the person accused of a violation. The notice shall be served in accordance with the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure and contain:

A statement of the grounds for imposing the civil penalty, including a citation to the statute involved;

A statement of the facts in support of the allegations;

A statement informing the person of the right to a hearing and that failure to timely request a hearing will result in imposition of the civil penalty stated.

A request for hearing on a proposed civil penalty shall be in writing and shall be submitted to the department no later than seven (7) days after receipt of the notice from the department. The hearing shall be conducted as a contested case before a hearing examiner of the office of administrative hearings. The hearing shall be no later than fifteen (15) days after receipt of the request for hearing, unless the person subject to the proposed civil penalty requests an extension of time for good cause shown. The hearing officer shall recommend a decision to the director of the department. After hearing or upon failure of the accused to request a hearing, the director of the department shall determine the amount of the civil penalty to be imposed in accordance with the limitations in this section. Judicial review, if any, shall be from the decision of the director and in accordance with the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

A civil penalty may be recovered in an action brought by the attorney general in the name of the state of Wyoming in any court of appropriate jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 207, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 9-680.6; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-406; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 125, § 1; 2011, ch. 82, § 1; 2012, ch. 106, § 1; 2013 ch. 134, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2021 ch. 90, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), substituted “seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00)” for “five hundred dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days”; and added (b).

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) per nonresident laborer employed per day, not to exceed a total penalty of ten percent (10%) of the amount of the person's contract” for “is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00)” in (a); substituted “contract subject to the provisions of this act” for “state contract” throughout (b); and added (c) through (e).

Laws 2012, ch. 106, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 21, 2012.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, inserted “within a twelve (12) month period from the date of the first offense” and “second” in (b).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "a public work" for "public works projects" in the second sentence of (a); and substituted "public work" for "project" in (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 16-6-202(a)(iv).